North Carolina, session 2025, SB640.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.66. Artificial intelligence instruction.
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for age-appropriate instruction on
artificial intelligence (AI) for kindergarten through grade 12. The standards shall include at least
the following:
(1) The basic concepts of artificial intelligence, including an age-appropriate
understanding of how AI systems source and create content.
(2) Real-world applications of AI.
(3) Economic, legal, and social issues surrounding the use of information provide
by AI.
(4) Responsible, ethical use of AI, including the following topics:
a. Privacy.
b. Oversight.
c. Academic dishonesty.
d. The effect of human bias on AI models.
(b) The standards adopted by the State Board may allow for AI instruction pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section to be included in the standards for computer science courses offered
in middle school and high school."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*S640-v-1*